Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-357
Truck-tractor, defined.

Truck-tractor means any motor vehicle designed and used primarily for towing other motor vehicles or trailers and not so constructed as to carry a load other than a part of the weight of the motor vehicle or trailer and load being towed.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 57.

Trailer and truck-tractor are defined by this section. Ashton v. State, 173 Neb. 78, 112 N.W.2d 540 (1961).